Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2736.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 28-20 of the General Laws entitled "Division of Occupational
Safety" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
28-20-36. Workers’ rights and worker safety.
(a) Upon a determination by the director of the department of labor and training that the
federal government has taken action to materially diminish the scope, enforcement capacity, or
regulatory authority of the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, whether through repeal,
defunding, reduction in force, rulemaking, executive order, or any other federal action that
substantially curtails the protections afforded to workers under the Occupational Safety and Health
Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.) and its implementing regulations, the occupational safety and
health standards codified in Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations Parts 1900 through 1990,
as in effect immediately prior to such federal action, shall be deemed adopted as the law of the
State of Rhode Island and shall be administered and enforced by the department of labor and
training.
(b) The director shall promptly notify the governor, the speaker of the house of
representatives, and the president of the senate upon making such determination. The general
assembly shall, during the legislative session in which such determination is made or, if the general
assembly is not in session, during the next regular session, appropriate such funds and authorize
such additional full-time equivalent positions as are necessary to enable the department of labor

and training to effectively administer and enforce the standards adopted pursuant to this section.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the general assembly from
subsequently amending, supplementing, or repealing any standard so adopted through the ordinary
legislative process.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005733
========
LC005733 - Page 2 of 3